Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 9 Law Enforcement Officer Training and Standards
12-9-508. National Center for Rural Law Enforcement Advisory Board.

There is established the National Center for Rural Law Enforcement Advisory Board to address policy issues, provide guidance, and further develop national initiatives.

The members of the board shall be appointed by the Director of the Criminal Justice Institute and approved by the President of the University of Arkansas and shall include:

The President of the University of Arkansas or his or her designee;

The Director of the Criminal Justice Institute;

A member of the House of Representatives;

A member of the Senate;

Two (2) executives with law enforcement experience;

A national-level executive with law enforcement experience;

A prominent academician; and

A nationally prominent citizen.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 30.

Subchapter 6

— Law Enforcement Officer Employment, Appointment, or Separation

12-9-601. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training; and

“Employing agency” means any state agency or any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state, or any agent thereof, which has constitutional or statutory authority to employ or appoint persons as law enforcement officers.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 949, § 1.

12-9-602. Notice of employment, appointment, or separation — Response by the law enforcement officer — Duty of division.

An employing agency shall immediately notify the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training, in a manner adopted by the division, of the employment or appointment, or separation from employment or appointment, of any law enforcement officer.

Separation from employment or appointment includes any firing, termination, resignation, retirement, or voluntary or involuntary extended leave of absence of any law enforcement officer.

A submission to the division related to the employment or appointment, or separation from employment or appointment, of a law enforcement officer is subject to the provisions of § 5-53-103 concerning false swearing.

In a case of separation from employment or appointment, the employing agency shall notify the division in a manner adopted by the division, setting forth in detail the facts and reasons for the separation.

In a case of a separation from employment or appointment for one (1) of the following reasons, the notice shall state that:

The law enforcement officer was separated for his or her failure to meet the minimum qualifications for employment or appointment as a law enforcement officer;

The law enforcement officer was dismissed for a violation of state or federal law;

The law enforcement officer was dismissed for a violation of the regulations of the law enforcement agency; or

The law enforcement officer resigned while he or she was the subject of a pending internal investigation.

Any law enforcement officer who has separated from employment or appointment shall be permitted to respond to the separation, in writing, to the division, setting forth the facts and reasons for the separation as he or she understands them.

Before employing or appointing a law enforcement officer, a subsequent employing agency shall contact the division to inquire as to the facts and reasons a law enforcement officer became separated from any previous employing agency.

The division shall provide subsequent employing agencies with all information in the division's possession resulting from the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.

An administrator of an employing agency who discloses information under this section is immune from civil liability for such disclosure or its consequences.

An employing agency is not civilly liable for disclosure of information under this subchapter or performing any other duties under this subchapter.

The division and its employees who disclose information under this section are immune from civil liability for such disclosure or its consequences.

The division and its employees are not civilly liable for:

Disclosure of information under this subchapter; or

Performing any other duties under this subchapter.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 151, § 8, used “commission” when adding the new language of present subdivisions (a)(3), (b)(1), and (c)(2) of this section. However, pursuant to the amendments made to this section by Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5828-5832, and pursuant to the authority of §25-43-109 and Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6343, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission has changed “commission” to “division” in these subdivisions.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5828, changed “commission” to “division” in former subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section. However, Acts 2019, No. 151, § 8, specifically repealed this subdivision.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5829, changed “commission” to “division” in the phrase “execute and maintain an affidavit-of-separation form adopted by the commission” in former subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section. However, Acts 2019, No. 151, § 8, specifically repealed this phrase.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5829, changed “commission” to “division” in former subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section. However, Acts 2019, No. 151, § 8, specifically repealed this subdivision.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 151 deleted (a)(1)(B) and redesignated former (a)(1)(A) as (a)(1); substituted “in a manner” for “in writing, or on a form” in (a)(1); added (a)(3); deleted (b)(1)(B) and (b)(1)(C) and redesignated former (b)(1)(A) as (b)(1); substituted “notify the commission in a manner” for “execute and maintain an affidavit-of-separation form” in (b)(1); substituted “shall” for “must” in (b)(3) and (c)(1); rewrote (c)(2); substituted “are not” for “shall not be” in the introductory language of (e)(2); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “division” for “commission” and made similar changes throughout the section; and substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” in (a)(1)(A).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 949, § 1; 1999, No. 949, § 1; 2019, No. 151, § 8; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5828-5832.

12-9-603. Certification review.

When an employing agency reports that a law enforcement officer was separated from employment or appointment for one (1) or more of the reasons specified in §12-9-602(b)(2), the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall review the certification of the law enforcement officer, the law enforcement officer's eligibility for certification, and the law enforcement officer's ability to act as a law enforcement officer, to determine whether to suspend or revoke the law enforcement officer's:

Certification;

Eligibility for certification; or

Ability to act as a law enforcement officer.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

[Reserved.]

Effective Dates. Acts 1979, No. 520, § 9: Mar. 21, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a problem of crisis proportion exists on the misuse of radio frequencies assigned to Arkansas law enforcement officers. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety of the citizens of Arkansas shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 949, § 1; 2019, No. 151, § 9.

12-9-206. Expenses furnished by academy — Exceptions.